Washington statutes.
RCW 10.96.040

Service of process issued by or in another state.

(1) A Washington recipient, when served with process that was issued by or in another state that on its face purports to be valid criminal process, shall comply with that process as if that process had been issued by a Washington court if the criminal process includes an attestation, made under penalty of perjury, stating that such process does not relate to criminal liability that is based on the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington. Any false attestation submitted under this section is subject to a statutory penalty of $10,000 per violation. Submission of such attestation subjects the attester to the jurisdiction of the courts of Washington state for any suit, penalty, or damages arising out of a false attestation under this section.

(2) A Washington recipient shall not be required to comply with a criminal process issued by or in another state that is related to criminal liability that is based on the provision, receipt, attempted provision or receipt, assistance in the provision or receipt, or attempted assistance in the provision or receipt of protected health care services as defined in RCW 7.115.010 that are lawful in the state of Washington.

[ 2023 c 193 s 12; 2008 c 21 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 193: See note following RCW 7.115.020.